Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-106
Money, defined.

The term money includes all kinds of coin and all kinds of paper, issued by or under authority of the United States, circulating as money. Money does not include central bank digital currency.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 4, p. 389;

R.S.1913, § 6292;

Laws 1921, c. 133, art. I, § 5, p. 545;

C.S.1922, § 5812;

C.S.1929, § 77-105;

R.S.1943, § 77-106;

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 71.